Vermont, session 2025-2026, S21.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The National Education Association reported in August 2024 that 83
percent of its members support a policy to prohibit use of cell phones and
personal electronic devices for the entire school day.
(2) In June 2024, U.S. Surgeon General Dr. Vivek Murthy called on
Congress to pass legislation requiring warning labels on social media because
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 2 of 7
these products have not been proven safe for children. He also called on
schools to “ensure that classroom learning and social time are phone-free
experiences.”
(3) Youth in Vermont are in a mental health crisis. According to the
2023 Vermont Youth Risk Behavior Survey (YRBS), 63 percent of high
school students said that their mental health was sometimes to always “not
good.” Suicide is the second leading cause of death for Vermont’s youth.
(4) The youth mental health crisis is driving up education costs in
Vermont. A 2024 Legislative Education Costs Survey conducted by the
Vermont Agency of Education found that the number of positions dedicated to
mental and behavioral health in the 48 responding supervisory unions and
districts was 142 in fiscal year 2022. By fiscal year 2025, that number had
risen to 790. Extrapolated to include the remaining four remaining supervisory
unions, those positions account for close to $53,000,000.00 of education
spending.
(5) The Vermont YRBS also found that 80 percent of high school
students use social media several times a day, with 40 percent using social
media at least one time every hour. 60 percent of middle school students
reported using social media several times a day, with 32 percent using it at
least once per hour.
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 3 of 7
(6) Phone-free policies have been shown to reduce the incidence of
hazing, harassment, and bullying in some schools. Lamoille South
Supervisory Union instituted a phone-free school day policy in August 2024.
Data from one of the supervisory union’s high schools showed nine hazing,
harassment, and bullying claims from August to October 2023, before the
policy, and just two such claims during the same period in 2024, after the
policy was enacted.
(7) Use of social media by school employees runs the risk of violating
the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act. Given this risk, as well as the
growing body of research that shows social media is not safe for kids, schools
and students are best served by utilizing communication tools other than social
media.
(8) As of November 2024, eight states have passed laws that ban or
restrict cell phone use in schools.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly for all students in
Vermont to access the benefits of a phone- and social media-free school
environment, which promotes focus, improved mental health, and increased
social cohesion.
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 4 of 7
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. chapter 9, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Cell Phone and Personal Electronic Device Use in Schools
§ 581. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Cell phone” means any device capable of using cellular technology
to facilitate voice service through a commercial telecommunications company,
regardless of whether the device can access internet services and electronic
mail.
(2) “Electronic device” means any device that:
(A) transmits sounds, images, texts, messages, videos, or electronic
information;
(B) electronically records, plays, or stores information; or
(C) accesses the internet or private communication or information
networks.
(3) “Parent” means a parent of a student and includes legal guardians
who are legally authorized to make education decisions for the student.
(4) “School” means any public school, independent school, career and
technical center, or prequalified private prekindergarten provider located in
Vermont.
(5) “Social media” means a website or internet medium that:
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 5 of 7
(A) permits a person to become a registered user, establish an
account, or create a profile for the purpose of allowing users to create, share,
and view user-generated content through such an account or profile;
(B) enables one or more users to generate content that can be viewed
by other users of the medium; and
(C) primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with content
generated by other users of the medium.
(6) “Student” means an individual currently enrolled or registered at a
school located in Vermont, as defined under subdivision (4) of this section.
§ 582. PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICES
(a) Policy requirement. Each school board or governing body of an
independent school or prequalified private prekindergarten provider shall
develop, adopt, and ensure implementation of, and make available in the
manner described under subdivision 563(1) of this title, a policy to prohibit
student use of cell phones and personal electronic devices at school from
arrival to dismissal. The policy may prohibit a student from bringing a
personal electronic device to school, require personal electronic devices to be
placed in a designated area on school property, or allow for utilization of a
product that functions to secure the personal electronic device such as a device
locker or lockable pouch.
(b) Exceptions.
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 6 of 7
(1) The policy shall provide an exception for students to possess and use
a cell phone or personal electronic device if a licensed physician or licensed
advanced practice registered nurse determines such possession or use is
necessary for the health of the student. A school may require documentation to
support an exception under this subdivision.
(2) The policy shall also provide an exception for students to possess
and use a cell phone or personal electronic device if such possession or use is
required as part of a student’s individualized education program or 504 plan,
which shall be documented according to applicable State and federal law.
§ 583. PROHIBITION OF INTEGRATION OF SOCIAL MEDIA
PLATFORMS INTO EDUCATION
(a) Schools, school districts, and supervisory unions are prohibited from:
(1) utilizing social media for communication with students directly; and
(2) asking, requiring, or permitting students’ use of social media for
school activities, out-of-school academic work, homework, school sports, or
extracurricular clubs and any other school-sponsored activities.
(b) Schools shall have in place measures to prevent students from accessing
social media while on school-issued electronic devices and while under the
supervision of the school.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 1 (findings) shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379276 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.21
2025 Page 7 of 7
(b) Sec. 2 (cell phone and personal electronic device use in schools) shall
take effect on December 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379276 v.1